Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1231.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide information and technical assistance to school districts that are exploring or implementing school starting times that, in comparison to schedules of the school district in preceding years, begin later in the day.(2) Examples of the information and technical assistance that may be provided under this section include:(a) Summaries of studies or other materials analyzing potential student health benefits associated with later school starting times; and(b) Summaries of processes, practices, and considerations used by school districts that have implemented later school starting times, including strategies for addressing concerns related to parent and guardian engagement, and potential impacts to transportation and extracurricular activity schedules.(3) For the purposes of this section, "school districts" include charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the later school starting times grant program is established. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grant program in accordance with this section.(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants to eligible school districts for either the exploration or implementation of later school starting times. School districts receiving grant funds under this section for the exploration of later school starting times are eligible to receive grant funds for implementing later school starting times in subsequent award cycles.(3) Beginning in 2028, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall submit an annual report to the appropriate committees of the legislature with a description and evaluation of the program actions required by this section. The report may include other information deemed pertinent by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, including a summary of actions taken in other states related to later school starting times and recommendations for statutory changes to support school districts that are exploring or implementing later school starting times.(4) For the purposes of this section, "school districts" include charter schools established under chapter 28A.710 RCW and state-tribal education compact schools subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.--- END ---